Arkansas, session 2025, HB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-54-122 is amended to read as follows:
5-54-122. Filing false report with law enforcement agency.
(a) As used in this section, “report” means any communication, either
written or oral, sworn or unsworn.
(b) A person commits the offense of filing a false report if he or she
files a report with any law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney's
office of:
(1) any alleged Alleged criminal wrongdoing on the part of
another person knowing that the report is false; or
(2) Conduct by another person that the reporting person alleges
should be investigated under the Arkansas Red Flag Law, § 12-15-401 et seq.,
knowing that the report to the law enforcement agency or prosecuting
attorney's office is false.
*CEB028*
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
(c)(1) Filing a false report is a Class D felony if:
(A) The alleged criminal wrongdoing is a capital offense,
Class Y felony, Class A felony, or Class B felony;
(B) The law enforcement agency or prosecuting attorney's
office to whom the false report is made has expended in excess of five
hundred dollars ($500) in order to investigate the false report, including
the costs of labor;
(C) Physical injury results to any person as a result of
the false report;
(D) The false report is made in an effort by the person
filing the false report to conceal his or her own criminal activity;
(E) The false report results in another person being
arrested or having his or her firearms taken from him or her under the
Arkansas Red Flag Law, § 12-15-401 et seq.; or
(F) The false report alleges another person purposely
selected the victim of a crime because the victim was a member of or was
associated with a recognizable and identifiable group or class who share
mental, physical, biological, cultural, political, or religious beliefs or
characteristics, for the purpose of delayed release under § 5-4-405.
(2) Otherwise, filing a false report is a Class A misdemeanor.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-73-103 is amended to read as follows:
5-73-103. Possession of firearms by certain persons.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section or unless
authorized by and subject to such conditions as prescribed by the Governor,
or his or her designee, or by the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco,
Firearms, and Explosives, or other bureau or office designated by the United
States Department of Justice, no a person shall not possess or own any a
firearm who has been:
(1) Convicted Has been convicted of a felony;
(2) Adjudicated Has been adjudicated mentally ill; or
(3) Committed Has been committed involuntarily to any mental
institution; or
(4) Is currently restricted from possessing a firearm under the
Arkansas Red Flag Law, § 12-15-401 et seq.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2) and (3) of this
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
section, a determination by a jury or a court that a person committed a
felony constitutes a conviction for purposes of subsection (a) of this
section even though the court suspended imposition of sentence or placed the
defendant on probation.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply to a
person whose case was dismissed and expunged or sealed under § 16-93-301 et
seq. or § 16-98-303(g).
(3) The determination by the jury or court that the person
committed a felony does not constitute a conviction for purposes of
subsection (a) of this section if the person is subsequently granted a pardon
explicitly restoring the ability to possess a firearm.
(c)(1) A person who violates subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this section
commits a Class B felony if:
(A) The person has a prior violent felony conviction;
(B) The person's current possession of a firearm involves
the commission of another crime; or
(C) The person has been previously convicted under this
section or a similar provision from another jurisdiction.
(2) A person who violates subdivisions (a)(1)-(3) of this
section commits a Class D felony if he or she has been previously convicted
of a felony and his or her present conduct or the prior felony conviction
does not fall within subdivision (c)(1) of this section.
(3) Otherwise, the person commits a violation of this section is
a Class A misdemeanor.
(d) The Governor may restore without granting a pardon the right of a
convicted felon or an adjudicated delinquent to own and possess a firearm
upon the recommendation of the chief law enforcement officer in the
jurisdiction in which the person resides, so long as the underlying felony or
delinquency adjudication:
(1) Did not involve the use of a weapon; and
(2) Occurred more than eight (8) years ago.
(e) As used in this section, “felony” means any state or federal
felony, excluding a federal or state felony offense for which the person
convicted has completed his or her sentence and pertaining to:
(1) An antitrust violation;
(2) An unfair trade practice;
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
(3) Restraint of trade; or
(4) Another offense relating to the regulation of business
practices.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 15, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 4 — Arkansas Red Flag Law

12-15-401. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Red
Flag Law".

12-15-402. Legislative intent.
(a) The intent of this subchapter is to provide for a temporary
restriction of access to a firearm for a person who has demonstrated that he
or she poses a risk of imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or to
another person while providing the person with due process to contest the
restriction if the person can show that he or she does not pose a risk of
imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person.
(b) Further, the General Assembly intends to provide for the return of
any firearm taken into custody to the person from whom the firearm was taken
either after a definite period of time or after the person has shown that he
or she no longer poses a risk of imminent personal injury to himself,
herself, or to another person.

12-15-403. Sworn affidavit required.
(a) Any two (2) certified law enforcement officers may swear under
oath by affidavit to a district court judge or circuit court judge that
probable cause exists to believe that:
(1) A person poses a risk of imminent personal injury to
himself, herself, or to another person; and
(2) The person possesses one (1) or more firearms.
(b) The certified law enforcement officers under subsection (a) of
this section shall not swear under oath by affidavit unless the certified law
enforcement officers have conducted an independent investigation and have
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
determined that probable cause exists as described in subsection (a) of this
section and that there is no reasonable alternative available to prevent the
person from causing imminent personal injury with a firearm to himself,
herself, or to another person.
(c) The independent investigation under this section may be initiated:
(1) In response to an application for an emergency risk
protection order and warrant under § 12-15-404; or
(2) By one (1) or more law enforcement officers if there is a
belief the investigation is warranted.

12-15-404. Filing application and supporting documents.
(a) Any person who believes an emergency risk protection order and
warrant is warranted under this subchapter may file an application under this
section.
(b)(1) An applicant for an emergency risk protection order and warrant
issued under this subchapter shall file a copy of the application for the
emergency risk protection order and warrant and all affidavits upon which the
emergency risk protection order and warrant are based with the clerk of the
district court or circuit court, as applicable.
(2) If an application for an emergency risk protection order and
warrant is filed before obtaining all affidavits upon which the emergency
risk protection order and warrant are based:
(A) The application shall be forwarded to the appropriate
law enforcement officers as determined by the clerk of the district court or
circuit court, as applicable; and
(B) If an independent investigation occurs and results in
the execution of affidavits under § 12-15-403, the affidavits shall be filed
with the clerk of the district court or circuit clerk, as appropriate, and
attached to the application for an emergency risk protection order and
warrant.
(c) Before the execution and return of an emergency risk protection
order and warrant issued under this subchapter, the clerk of the district
court or circuit court, as applicable, shall not disclose any information
pertaining to the application for the emergency risk protection order and
warrant or any affidavits upon which the emergency risk protection order and
warrant are based.
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
(d) An emergency risk protection order and warrant issued under this
subchapter shall be executed and returned with reasonable promptness
consistent with due process of law and shall be accompanied by a written
inventory of all firearms taken into custody.

12-15-405. Issuance of emergency risk protection order and warrant by
judge — Grounds and findings.
(a) A district court judge or circuit court judge may only issue an
emergency risk protection order and warrant under this subchapter if the
sworn affidavit under § 12-15-403 establishes the required grounds for
issuing the emergency risk protection order and warrant.
(b) In determining whether grounds for the emergency risk protection
order and warrant exist or whether there is probable cause to believe the
grounds exist, the district court judge or circuit court judge shall consider
any recent:
(1) Threat or act of violence by the person directed toward
another person; and
(2) Threat or act of violence by the person directed toward
himself or herself.
(c) When evaluating under this section whether the recent threat or
act of violence constitutes probable cause to believe that the person poses a
risk of imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person,
the district court judge or circuit court judge may consider other factors,
including without limitation:
(1) The reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm by
the person;
(2) A history of the use, attempted use, or threatened use of
physical force by the person against another person; and
(3) Prior involuntary confinement of the person in a mental
health facility or other medical facility where the person received treatment
for a mental health condition.
(d)(1) If the district court judge or circuit court judge is satisfied
that grounds for the emergency risk protection order and warrant under this
subchapter exist or that there is probable cause to believe that the grounds
exist, the district court judge or circuit court judge shall issue an
emergency risk protection order and warrant naming or describing the person,
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
place, or thing to be searched, and what thing or things shall be seized or
otherwise taken into custody.
(2) If the search results in the discovery of a firearm
possessed by the person who has been shown to pose a risk of imminent
personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person, the law
enforcement agency conducting the search shall take the firearm into custody.

12-15-406. Orders contained in emergency risk protection order and
warrant.
An emergency risk protection order and warrant issued under this
subchapter shall:
(1) Be directed to any certified law enforcement officer;
(2) State the grounds or circumstances constituting probable
cause for issuance of the emergency risk protection order and warrant;
(3) Command the certified law enforcement officer to immediately
search the person, place, or thing named in the emergency risk protection
order and warrant for any firearm; and
(4) Order the certified law enforcement officer to take any
firearm located or discovered into the certified law enforcement officer's
custody.

12-15-407. Copy of emergency risk protection order and warrant to be
given to named person.
A copy of an emergency risk protection order and warrant issued under
this subchapter shall be given to the person named in the emergency risk
protection order and warrant together with a notice informing the person that
he or she has the right to a hearing under this subchapter and the right to
be represented by an attorney at the hearing.

12-15-408. Hearing required.
(a)(1)(A) No later than three (3) days after the execution of an
emergency risk protection order and warrant issued under this subchapter, a
court with jurisdiction shall hold a hearing to determine whether any firearm
taken into custody should be returned to the person named in the emergency
risk protection order and warrant or should continue to be held by the state.
(B) The period of three (3) days under subdivision
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
(a)(1)(A) of this section does not include a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.
(2)(A) A hearing is not required under this section if the
person from whom the firearm was taken into custody voluntarily forfeits
possession and ownership of the firearm.
(B)(i) A firearm voluntarily forfeited under this
subsection shall be held for thirty (30) days pending a claim of ownership of
the firearm by another person, during which time the person claiming
ownership may file a petition in a court with jurisdiction to determine
whether or not the person claiming ownership is the true owner of the
firearm.
(ii) In a hearing to determine the true ownership of
a firearm under this subdivision (a)(2)(B), the prosecuting attorney shall
represent the law enforcement agency that has custody of the firearm.
(iii) There is no filing fee required to file a
petition under this subdivision (a)(2)(B).
(iv) The court in which a petition is filed under
this subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall return the firearm to the petitioner if the
petitioner can show he or she is the true owner of the firearm by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(C) If after thirty (30) days a petition claiming
ownership of the firearm has not been filed in a court with jurisdiction or
if after a hearing on a petition the court with jurisdiction has determined
that the petitioner has not proven true ownership of the firearm, the law
enforcement agency that took the firearm into custody shall within forty-
eight (48) hours destroy the firearm.
(b) At a hearing under this section, the state shall be represented by
the prosecuting attorney and has the burden of proving all material facts by
clear and convincing evidence.
(c)(1)(A) If, after a hearing under this section, the court finds by
clear and convincing evidence that the person from whom a firearm was taken
into custody poses a risk of imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or
to another person, the court may order that a firearm taken into custody
under this subchapter continue to be held by the state for a period not to
exceed one (1) year.
(B) The person from whom the firearm was taken into
custody may petition the court for the return of the firearm before the one-
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
year period of time has elapsed under § 12-15-410.
(2) If the court does not find by clear and convincing evidence
that the person from whom a firearm was taken into custody poses a risk of
imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person, the court
shall order the firearm taken into custody to be returned to the person named
in the emergency risk protection order and warrant.
(d)(1) If the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the
person whose firearm has been taken into custody poses a risk of imminent
personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person, the court shall
give notice to the prosecuting attorney and local law enforcement agencies
with jurisdiction that the person may be in need of mental health services or
other medical treatment.
(2)(A) Upon receiving notice under this subsection, the
prosecuting attorney may institute commitment proceedings under § 20-47-201
et seq. or § 20-64-801 et seq. if the prosecuting attorney has not done so
already.
(B) The findings of the court conducting a hearing under
this section may form the required basis and factual predicate for any
subsequent commitment proceeding under § 20-47-201 et seq. or § 20-64-801 et
seq.

12-15-409. Transfer of firearm permitted.
(a) As used in this section, "eligible person" means a person who:
(1) Does not reside with the person whose firearm has been taken
into custody under this subchapter;
(2) Agrees that the firearm shall not be returned to the person
whose firearm has been taken into custody under this subchapter;
(3) Swears under oath that the person whose firearm has been
taken into custody shall not have access to the firearm; and
(4) May lawfully possess the firearm.
(b) A person whose firearm has been taken into custody under this
subchapter, or the person's legal representative, may transfer ownership of
the firearm as provided by law to an eligible person.
(c) Upon written notification to the law enforcement agency, state
agency, court, or other entity in possession of the firearm taken into
custody by the person or the person's legal representative and the eligible
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
person to whom ownership of the firearm was transferred, the law enforcement
agency, state agency, court, or other entity holding the firearm taken into
custody shall deliver within ten (10) days the firearm to the eligible person
to whom ownership of the firearm was transferred.
(d) An eligible person upon conviction is guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor if he or she knowingly permits the person from whom the firearm
was taken under this subchapter to possess or have access to the firearm
after the transfer of ownership of the firearm within one (1) year of the
transfer of the firearm.

12-15-410. Early return of firearm taken into custody.
(a) A person who has had his or her firearm taken into custody under
this subchapter may petition the court with jurisdiction for the early return
of his or her firearm.
(b) A person who has had his or her firearm taken into custody under
this subchapter may not:
(1) File a petition under this section more than two (2) times
within any twelve-month period; or
(2) File a petition under this section until at least four (4)
months have passed since the court found that at that time the person posed a
risk of imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person
and ordered the firearm taken into custody.
(c)(1) There is no filing fee required for the first petition filed by
a person under this section as to a specific emergency risk protection order
and warrant taking the person's firearm into custody.
(2) For a second petition filed under this section as to a
specific emergency risk protection order and warrant taking the person's
firearm into custody, the filing fee shall be as otherwise provided by law.
(d)(1) A person may not file a petition under this section if at the
time of filing he or she:
(A) Is in custody or incarcerated for any reason or was
arrested since an emergency risk protection order and warrant under this
subchapter was issued against him or her for a felony offense or a
misdemeanor offense involving the use of or threat of violence;
(B) Is subject to a protective order under the Domestic
Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq.; or
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1033
(C) Has been involuntarily committed under § 20-64-801 et
seq.
(2) A pending petition filed under this section shall be
immediately dismissed by the court without a hearing if, after the date the
petition was filed, the person:
(A) Was arrested for a felony offense or a misdemeanor
offense involving the use of or threat of violence;
(B) Is subject to a protective order under the Domestic
Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq.; or
(C) Has been voluntarily or involuntarily committed under
§ 20-64-801 et seq. or admitted to a crisis intervention unit under the
Behavioral Health Crisis Intervention Protocol Act of 2017, § 20-47-801 et
seq.
(e) The court shall return the firearm taken into custody to the
person from whom the firearm was taken if the person can show by a
preponderance of the evidence that the person no longer poses a risk of
imminent personal injury to himself, herself, or to another person.

12-15-411. Third-party civil liability.
(a) As used in this section, "public employee" means a public employee
employed in a law enforcement, judicial, social work, mental health, or
medical capacity who is trained to identify, diagnose, investigate, or to
intervene in threats to the public.
(b)(1) A person who is not a public employee may be civilly liable to
a person against whom this subchapter is applied if the person who is not a
public employee knowingly makes a false report to a law enforcement agency or
other governmental body with the purpose of improperly depriving the person
against whom this subchapter is applied of his or her lawfully possessed
firearm, including without limitation submitting an application under § 12-
15-404 with the purpose of improperly depriving a person of his or her
lawfully possessed firearm.
(2) Damages in a civil lawsuit under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section are limited to attorney's fees, costs of litigation, and compensatory
damages that result directly from the deprivation of the person's firearm.

/s/McCullough
01-16-2025 15:09:40 CEB028